District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.26

Issuance of duplicate congressional tags.

Each Senator, member of the House of Representatives, and other individual who is authorized by law to be issued a congressional tag for his automobile shall, upon application therefor, be entitled to be issued a duplicate tag bearing the same number.

History

Aug. 5, 1977, 91 Stat. 684, Pub. L. 95-94, title IV, § 410

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-709.
1973 Ed., § 40-603c.